customize_system/packages/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf-0.1/gcs/conffiles_skel/opt/openoffice.org2.1/share/dict/ooo/es_ES.aff
SFX W   ertir irtiere     ertir
SFX W   ervir irviere     ervir
SFX W   estir istiere     estir
SFX W   r     ere         eunir
SFX W   etir  itiere      etir
SFX W   irir  iriere      irir
SFX W   r     ere         ohibir
SFX W   ír    yere        oír
SFX W   orir  uriere      orir
SFX W   ormir urmiere     ormir
SFX W   cir   jere        ducir
SFX W   r     ere         [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yere        [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyere       güir
SFX W   ir    ere         ullir
SFX W   ir    ere         uñir
SFX W   ar    uvieres     andar
SFX W   r     res         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     res         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     res         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieres     aber
SFX W   er    ieres       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieres     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieres       aler
SFX W   er    yeres       caer
SFX W   er    ieres       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeres       [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieres       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieres     ener
SFX W   er    ieres       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieres     erer
SFX W   er    ieres       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieres     oder
SFX W   er    ieres       olver
SFX W   oner  usieres     oner
SFX W   er    ieres       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeres       raer
SFX W   r     eres        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieres     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeres      ecir
SFX W   edir  idieres     edir
SFX W   egir  igieres     egir
SFX W   emir  imieres     emir
SFX W   eír   ieres       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeres      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieres    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieres   enchir
SFX W   endir indieres    endir
SFX W   enir  inieres     enir
SFX W   entir intieres    entir
SFX W   erir  irieres     erir
SFX W   r     eres        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieres    ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieres    ervir
SFX W   estir istieres    estir
SFX W   r     eres        eunir
SFX W   etir  itieres     etir
SFX W   irir  irieres     irir
SFX W   r     eres        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yeres       oír
SFX W   orir  urieres     orir
SFX W   ormir urmieres    ormir
SFX W   cir   jeres       ducir
SFX W   r     eres        [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yeres       [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyeres      güir
SFX W   ir    eres        ullir
SFX W   ir    eres        uñir
SFX W   ar    uviéremos   andar
SFX W   ar    áremos      [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    áremos      [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    áremos      [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiéremos   aber
SFX W   er    iéremos     [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciéremos   [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iéremos     aler
SFX W   er    yéremos     caer
SFX W   er    iéremos     e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yéremos     [eo]er
SFX W   er    iéremos     ender
SFX W   ener  uviéremos   ener
SFX W   er    iéremos     er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiéremos   erer
SFX W   er    iéremos     o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiéremos   oder
SFX W   er    iéremos     olver
SFX W   oner  usiéremos   oner
SFX W   er    iéremos     or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jéremos     raer
SFX W   r     éremos      alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiéremos   ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijéremos    ecir
SFX W   edir  idiéremos   edir
SFX W   egir  igiéremos   egir
SFX W   emir  imiéremos   emir
SFX W   eír   iéremos     eír
SFX W   eñir  iñéremos    eñir
SFX W   eguir iguiéremos  eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiéremos enchir
SFX W   endir indiéremos  endir
SFX W   enir  iniéremos   enir
SFX W   entir intiéremos  entir
SFX W   erir  iriéremos   erir
SFX W   r     éremos      ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiéremos  ertir
SFX W   ervir irviéremos  ervir
SFX W   estir istiéremos  estir
SFX W   r     éremos      eunir
SFX W   etir  itiéremos   etir
SFX W   irir  iriéremos   irir
SFX W   r     éremos      ohibir
SFX W   ír    yéremos     oír
SFX W   orir  uriéremos   orir
SFX W   ormir urmiéremos  ormir
SFX W   cir   jéremos     ducir
SFX W   r     éremos      [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yéremos     [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyéremos    güir
SFX W   ir    éremos      ullir
SFX W   ir    éremos      uñir
SFX W   ar    uviereis    andar
SFX W   r     reis        [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     reis        [^n]dar
SFX W   r     reis        [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiereis    aber
SFX W   er    iereis      [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciereis    [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iereis      aler
SFX W   er    yereis      caer
SFX W   er    iereis      e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yereis      [eo]er
SFX W   er    iereis      ender
SFX W   ener  uviereis    ener
SFX W   er    iereis      er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiéreis    erer
SFX W   er    iereis      o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiereis    oder
SFX W   er    iereis      olver
SFX W   oner  usiereis    oner
SFX W   er    iereis      or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jereis      raer
SFX W   r     ereis       alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiereis    ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijereis     ecir
SFX W   edir  idiereis    edir
SFX W   egir  igiereis    egir
SFX W   emir  imiereis    emir
SFX W   eguir iguiereis   eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiereis  enchir
SFX W   endir indiereis   endir
SFX W   eír   iereis      eír
SFX W   eñir  iñereis     eñir
SFX W   enir  iniereis    enir
SFX W   entir intiereis   entir
SFX W   erir  iriereis    erir
SFX W   r     ereis       ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiereis   ertir
SFX W   ervir irviereis   ervir
SFX W   estir istiereis   estir
SFX W   etir  itiereis    etir
SFX W   irir  iriereis    irir
SFX W   r     ereis       ohibir
SFX W   ír    yereis      oír
SFX W   orir  uriereis    orir
SFX W   ormir urmiereis   ormir
SFX W   cir   jereis      ducir
SFX W   r     eris        [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yereis      [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyereis     güir
SFX W   ir    ereis       ullir
SFX W   ir    ereis       uñir
SFX W   ar    uvieren     andar
SFX W   r     ren         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ren         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ren         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieren     aber
SFX W   er    ieren       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieren     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieren       aler
SFX W   er    yeren       caer
SFX W   er    ieren       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeren       [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieren       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieren     ener
SFX W   er    ieren       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieren     erer
SFX W   er    ieren       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieren     oder
SFX W   er    ieren       olver
SFX W   oner  usieren     oner
SFX W   er    ieren       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeren       raer
SFX W   r     eren        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieren     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeren      ecir
SFX W   edir  idieren     edir
SFX W   egir  igieren     egir
SFX W   emir  imieren     emir
SFX W   eír   ieren       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeren      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieren    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieren   enchir
SFX W   endir indieren    endir
SFX W   enir  inieren     enir
SFX W   entir intieren    entir
SFX W   erir  irieren     erir
SFX W   r     eren        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieren    ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieren    ervir
SFX W   estir istieren    estir
SFX W   r     eren        eunir
SFX W   etir  itieren     etir
SFX W   irir  irieren     irir
SFX W   r     eren        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yeren       oír
SFX W   orir  urieren     orir
SFX W   ormir urmieren    ormir
SFX W   cir   jeren       ducir
SFX W   r     eren        [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yeren       [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyeren      güir
SFX W   ir    eren        ullir
SFX W   ir    eren        uñir
SFX W   cer   z           [fh]acer
SFX W   r     d           [aeií]r
